Washington statutes.
RCW 18.410.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.

[ 2023 c 412 s 3.]